Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1440
Action for possession.

An action for possession of any premises subject to the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act shall be commenced in the manner described by sections 76-1440 to 76-1447.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 40;

Laws 1991, LB 324, § 2.